zh-CN: MIDI 连接: MIDI 输入; MIDI 输出; USB MIDI; 其他
pt-BR: Conectividade MIDI: Entrada MIDI; Saída MIDI; MIDI USB; Outro
sl-SI: MIDI povezljivost: MIDI vhod; MIDI izhod; USB midi; Drugo
sk-SK: MIDI konektivita: MIDI vstup; MIDI výstup; USB midi; Iné
lt-LT: MIDI sąsaja: MIDI įvestis; MIDI išvestis; USB midi; Kita
bg-BG: MIDI свързаност: MIDI вход; MIDI изход; USB midi; Други
fr: Connectivité MIDI: MIDI in; MIDI out; USB midi; Autre
ru: Подключение MIDI: Вход MIDI; Выход MIDI; USB midi; Другое
zh-TW: 音樂數位介面連接性: MIDI in; MIDI out; USB midi; 其他
hu: MIDI-csatlakozás: MIDI be; MIDI ki; USB midi; Egyéb
nb: Midi-tilkobling: MIDI inn; MIDI ut; USB midi; Annet
es: Conectividad MIDI: MIDI de entrada; MIDI de salida; MIDI USB; Otros
nl: Midi-connectiviteit: MIDI-in; MIDI-uit; USB-midi; Andere
sv: Midi-anslutbarhet: MIDI in; MIDI ut; USB midi; Övrigt
fi: Midi-liitettävyys: MIDI sisään; MIDI ulos; USB midi; Muu
cs: MIDI připojení: Vstup MIDI; Výstup MIDI; USB midi; Jiné
de: MIDI-Konnektivität: MIDI-Eingang; MIDI-Ausgang; USB-Midi; Sonstiges
pl: Łączność Midi: MIDI in; MIDI out; USB midi; Inne
tr: Midi Bağlantısı: MIDI girişi; MIDI çıkışı; USB midi; Diğer
en: MIDI connectivity: MIDI in; MIDI out; USB midi; Other
ko: 미디 연결: MIDI 인; MIDI 아웃; USB midi; 기타
el: Συνδεσιμότητα MIDI: MIDI in; MIDI out; USB midi; Άλλο
ro-RO: Conectivitate MIDI: MIDI in; MIDI out; USB midi; Altele
it: Connettività MIDI: MIDI in; MIDI out; USB midi; Altro
th: การเชื่อมต่อ MIDI: MIDI ขาเข้า; MIDI ขาออก; USB midi; อื่นๆ
ja: MIDI接続: MIDI入力; MIDI出力; USB MIDI; その他
vi: Khả năng kết nối MIDI: Đầu vào MIDI; Đầu ra MIDI; Midi USB; Khác
da: Midi-forbindelse: MIDI ind; MIDI ud; USB midi; Andet
hr-HR: MIDI povezivost: MIDI ulaz; MIDI izlaz; USB midi; Ostalo
pt-PT: Conectividade MIDI: MIDI in; MIDI out; USB midi; Outro